Hawaii statutes.
§200-44 Possession by interested party. Any
person having an interest in the vessel taken into custody may take possession
of the vessel prior to the date of public auction upon payment to the state or
county agency that took custody of the vessel of all use fees, towing, handling
and storage charges, appraisal and advertising expenses, and any other expenses
incurred by that state or county agency in connection with the vessel. If the
person taking possession of the vessel is not the registered or documented
owner, the person, prior to taking possession of the vessel, shall pay the
foregoing expenses and post security satisfactory to the state or county
agency, which shall not exceed the value of the vessel. The security, if not
forfeited, shall be returned to the person posting it within two years after
receipt. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 70, §3; am L 2012, c 146, §3]

Case Notes

State had no statutory basis upon which to charge fees for
the impoundment and disposal of vessel under §200-49 or this section where
vessel had not been repossessed and State had engaged in the negotiated sale of
the vessel for a purchase price of $0.00. 91 H. 1, 979 P.2d 586.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next